Florida, session 2026, SB504.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 162.41, Florida Statutes, is created to 18 read: 19 162.41âCode inspector body cameras; policies and 20 procedures.â 21 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 22 (a)ââBody cameraâ means a portable electronic recording 23 device worn on a code inspectorâs person which records audio and 24 video data of the code inspectorâs encounters and activities. 25 (b)ââCode inspectorâ has the same meaning as in s. 26 162.04(2). 27 (2)âA governmental entity that permits its code inspectors 28 to wear body cameras shall establish policies and procedures 29 addressing the proper use, maintenance, and storage of body 30 cameras and the data recorded by body cameras. The policies and 31 procedures must include all of the following: 32 (a)âGeneral guidelines for the proper use, maintenance, and 33 storage of body cameras. 34 (b)âAny limitation on which code inspectors are permitted 35 to wear body cameras. 36 (c)âAny limitation on code enforcement-related encounters 37 and activities in which code inspectors are permitted to wear 38 body cameras. A code inspector must be permitted to use a body 39 camera to record any encounter with a member of the public which 40 occurs while the inspector is performing his or her duties. 41 (d)âGeneral guidelines for the proper storage, retention, 42 and release of audio and video data recorded by body cameras. 43 (3)âA governmental entity that permits its code inspectors 44 to wear body cameras shall do all of the following: 45 (a)âEnsure that all personnel who wear, use, maintain, or 46 store body cameras are trained in the governmental entityâs body 47 camera policies and procedures. 48 (b)âEnsure that all personnel who use, maintain, store, or 49 release audio or video data recorded by body cameras are trained 50 in the governmental entityâs policies and procedures. 51 (c)âRetain audio and video data recorded by body cameras in 52 accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as 53 otherwise provided by law. 54 (d)âPerform a periodic review of actual body camera 55 practices to ensure conformity with the governmental entityâs 56 body camera policies and procedures. 57 (4)âChapter 934 does not apply to body camera recordings 58 made by code inspectors who elect to use body cameras. 59 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.